Arkansas, session 2025, SB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1901(7), concerning the definition of
"specialty hospital" relating to the assessment fee on hospitals, is amended
to read as follows:
(7) “Specialty hospital” means an acute care general hospital
that:
(A) Limits services primarily to children and qualifies as
exempt from the Medicare prospective payment system regulation; or
(B) Is primarily or exclusively engaged in the care and
treatment of patients with:
(i) Cardiac cardiac conditions; or
(ii) Orthopedic or spinal conditions;



*JMB585*
03/20/2025 9:50:50 AM JMB585